Utah statutes.
61-2b-24.   Expert witness, licensing, certification, registration documents -- Assigned number to be used on contracts -- Surrender of documents upon suspension.

(1)  The division shall issue to a person approved as an expert witness, licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter a document:

(a)  stating that the person is approved as an expert witness, licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter; and

(b)  specifying the expiration date of a license or certification.

(2) (a)  An approval as an expert witness, a license, a certification, or a registration document issued under this chapter shall bear an approval, license, certification, or registration number assigned by the division.

(b)  An assigned number shall be used in a statement of qualification, a contract, or another instrument used by the holder of the approval, license, certificate, or registration when reference is made to the holder's status as being approved, licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter.

(3) (a)  An approval, license, certification, or registration document is the property of the state.

(b)  Upon a suspension or revocation of a license, certification, or registration under this chapter, the individual holding the applicable document shall immediately return the document to the division.

